Washington statutes.
RCW 19.110.150

Order to cease and desist—Hearing—Notice.

(1) The director may order any person to cease and desist from an act or practice if it appears that the person is violating or is about to violate any provision of this chapter or any rule or order issued under this chapter.

(2) Reasonable notice of and opportunity for a hearing shall be given. The director may issue a temporary order to cease and desist pending the hearing. The temporary order shall remain in effect until ten days after the hearing. If a person does not request a hearing within fifteen days of receiving an order to cease and desist, the order becomes final. Any person who is named in the order to cease and desist shall be notified of the right to request a hearing within fifteen days.

[ 1981 c 155 s 15.]